Utah statutes.
13-42-109.    Certification of registration -- Issuance or denial.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsections (2) and (3), the
administrator shall issue a certificate of registration as a provider to a
person that complies with Sections 13-42-105 and 13-42-106.
(2)  The administrator may deny registration if:
(a)  the application contains information that is materially erroneous or
incomplete;
(b)  an officer, director, or owner of the applicant has been convicted of a
crime, or suffered a civil judgment, involving dishonesty or the violation of
state or federal securities laws;
(c)  the applicant or any of its officers, directors, or owners has defaulted
in the payment of money collected for others; or
(d)  the administrator finds that the financial responsibility, experience,
character, or general fitness of the applicant or its owners, directors,
employees, or agents does not warrant belief that the business will be
operated in compliance with this chapter.
(3)  The administrator shall deny registration if:
(a)  the application is not accompanied by the fee established by the
administrator in accordance with Section 63J-1-504; or
(b)  with respect to an applicant that is organized as a not-for-profit entity
or has obtained tax-exempt status under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.
Section 501, the applicant's board of directors is not independent of the
applicant's employees and agents.
(4)  Subject to adjustment of the dollar amount pursuant to Subsection
13-42-132(6), a board of directors is not independent for purposes of
Subsection (3) if more than one-fourth of its members:
(a)  are affiliates of the applicant, as defined in Subsection 13-42-102(2)(a)
or 13-42-102(2)(b)(i), (ii), (iv), (v), (vi), or (vii); or
(b)  after the date 10 years before first becoming a director of the
applicant, were employed by or directors of a person that received from the
applicant more than $25,000 in either the current year or the preceding year.
